nb: Vinproduksjonsfase: Modning og lagring; Ettersøtning; Tapping og pakking; Karbonering; Klarning; Knusing og pressing; Filtrering; Primærgjæring; Omtapping; Desinfisering og rengjøring; Sekundærgjæring; Stabilisering; Testing og måling; Annet
en: Wine making stage: Aging & bulk storage; Backsweetening; Bottling & packaging; Carbonation; Clarifying & fining; Crushing & pressing; Filtering; Primary fermentation; Racking & transferring; Sanitizing & cleaning; Secondary fermentation; Stabilizing; Testing & measuring; Other
th: ขั้นตอนการผลิตไวน์: การบ่มและการจัดเก็บปริมาณมาก; การเติมความหวานหลังหมัก; การบรรจุขวดและบรรจุภัณฑ์; การอัดก๊าซคาร์บอน; การทำให้ใสและตกตะกอน; การบดและการคั้น; การกรอง; การหมักครั้งแรก; การแยกกากและการถ่ายเท; การฆ่าเชื้อและการทำความสะอาด; การหมักครั้งที่สอง; การทำให้คงตัว; การทดสอบและการวัด; อื่นๆ
el: Στάδιο οινοποίησης: Παλαίωση & χύδην αποθήκευση; Επαναγλύκανση; Εμφιάλωση & συσκευασία; Ενανθράκωση; Φιλτράρισμα & διαύγαση; Έκθλιψη & πίεση; Φιλτράρισμα; Πρωτογενής ζύμωση; Απολάσπωση & μεταφορά; Απολύμανση & καθαρισμός; Δευτερογενής ζύμωση; Σταθεροποίηση; Δοκιμή & μέτρηση; Άλλο
sv: Vinframställningsfas: Mognad och lagring; Eftersötning; Buteljering och förpackning; Kolsyresättning; Klarning; Krossning och pressning; Filtrering; Primärjäsning; Omtappning och överföring; Desinficering och rengöring; Sekundärjäsning; Stabilisering; Testning och mätning; Övrigt
nl: Wijn bereiding fase: Rijping en bulkopslag; Aanzoeten; Bottelen en verpakken; Koolzuurhoudend maken; Klaren; Kneuzen en persen; Filteren; Eerste gisting; Hevelen en overbrengen; Ontsmetten en reinigen; Tweede gisting; Stabiliseren; Testen en meten; Overige
fi: Viininvalmistuksen vaihe: Kypsytys ja varastointi; Jälkimakeutus; Pullotus ja pakkaus; Hiilihapotus; Kirkastus; Murskaus ja puristus; Suodatus; Pääkäyminen; Lappoaminen ja siirto; Desinfiointi ja puhdistus; Jälkikäyminen; Stabilointi; Testaus ja mittaus; Muu
vi: Giai đoạn sản xuất rượu vang: Ủ và bảo quản khối lượng lớn; Tạo ngọt lại; Đóng chai & đóng gói; Thêm ga; Làm trong; Ép & vắt; Lọc; Lên men sơ cấp; Chiết và chuyển; Vệ sinh & làm sạch; Lên men thứ cấp; Ổn định; Thử nghiệm & đo lường; Khác
zh-CN: 酿酒阶段: 陈酿和批量储存; 回甜; 装瓶和包装; 碳酸化; 澄清; 破碎和压榨; 过滤; 初次发酵; 换桶和转移; 消毒和清洁; 二次发酵; 稳定处理; 测试和测量; 其他
tr: Şarap yapım aşaması: Yıllandırma ve toplu depolama; Sonradan tatlandırma; Şişeleme ve paketleme; Karbonatlama; Berraklaştırma ve arıtma; Ezme ve presleme; Filtreleme; Birincil fermantasyon; Aktarma ve transfer; Dezenfekte etme ve temizleme; İkincil fermantasyon; Stabilize etme; Test etme ve ölçme; Diğer
ro-RO: Etapa de vinificație: Maturare și depozitare în vrac; Îndulcire ulterioară; Îmbuteliere și ambalare; Carbonatare; Limpezire și cleire; Zdrobire și presare; Filtrare; Fermentare primară; Pritocire și transfer; Igienizare și curățare; Fermentare secundară; Stabilizare; Testare și măsurare; Altele
de: Phase der Weinherstellung: Reifung & Tanklagerung; Nachsüßen; Abfüllung & Verpackung; Karbonisierung; Klärung & Schönung; Maischen & Pressen; Filtern; Hauptgärung; Abstich & Umfüllen; Desinfektion & Reinigung; Nachgärung; Stabilisierung; Prüfen & Messen; Sonstige
es: Etapa de elaboración del vino: Añejamiento y almacenamiento a granel; Endulzado posterior; Embotellado y envasado; Carbonatación; Clarificación y afinado; Estrujado y prensado; Filtrado; Fermentación primaria; Trasiego y transferencia; Desinfección y limpieza; Fermentación secundaria; Estabilización; Pruebas y medición; Otro
da: Fase i vinfremstilling: Lagring og bulkopbevaring; Eftersødning; Tapning og emballering; Karbonering; Klaring; Knusning og presning; Filtrering; Primær gæring; Omstikning og overførsel; Desinficering og rengøring; Sekundær gæring; Stabilisering; Test og måling; Andet
ja: ワイン製造工程: 熟成およびバルク貯蔵; 後甘味付け; 瓶詰めおよびパッケージング; 炭酸化; 清澄化; 破砕および圧搾; ろ過; 一次発酵; 澱引きおよび移し替え; 殺菌および洗浄; 二次発酵; 安定化; 試験および測定; その他
pt-BR: Produção de vinho etapa: Envelhecimento e armazenamento a granel; Adoçamento final; Engarrafamento e embalagem; Carbonatação; Clarificação e colagem; Esmagamento e prensagem; Filtragem; Fermentação primária; Trasfega e transferência; Sanitização e limpeza; Fermentação secundária; Estabilização; Testes e medições; Outro
ru: Стадия виноделия: Выдержка и хранение наливом; Пост-подслащивание (бэк-свитнинг); Розлив и упаковка; Карбонизация; Осветление и оклейка; Дробление и прессование; Фильтрация; Первичное брожение; Снятие с осадка и переливка; Дезинфекция и очистка; Вторичное брожение; Стабилизация; Тестирование и измерения; Другое
zh-TW: 釀酒階段: 熟成與散裝儲存; 補糖; 裝瓶與包裝; 碳酸氣化; 過濾澄清; 破碎與壓榨; 過濾; 主發酵; 換桶與移轉; 消毒與清潔; 二次發酵; 穩定化; 測試與測量; 其他
sk-SK: Fáza výroby vína: Zrenie a skladovanie; Dosládzanie; Fľaškovanie a balenie; Sýtenie; Čírenie; Mletie a lisovanie; Filtrovanie; Primárna fermentácia; Stáčanie a prečerpávanie; Sanitácia a čistenie; Sekundárna fermentácia; Stabilizácia; Testovanie a meranie; Iné
lt-LT: Vyno gamybos etapas: Brandinimas ir laikymas didelėse talpose; Papildomas saldinimas; Išpilstymas ir pakavimas; Karbonizacija; Skaidrinimas ir valymas; Traiškymas ir presavimas; Filtravimas; Pirminė fermentacija; Nupylimas ir perpylimas; Dezinfekavimas ir valymas; Antrinė fermentacija; Stabilizavimas; Testavimas ir matavimas; Kita
it: Fase della vinificazione: Invecchiamento e stoccaggio sfuso; Dolcificazione finale; Imbottigliamento e confezionamento; Carbonazione / Presa di spuma; Chiarificazione e affinamento; Pigiatura e pressatura; Filtraggio; Fermentazione primaria; Travaso e trasferimento; Sanificazione e pulizia; Fermentazione secondaria; Stabilizzazione; Test e misurazione; Altro
pl: Etap produkcji wina: Dojrzewanie i leżakowanie; Dosładzanie; Butelkowanie i pakowanie; Karbonatyzacja; Klarowanie; Rozdrabnianie i tłoczenie; Filtrowanie; Fermentacja burzliwa; Zlewanie znad osadu i przelewanie; Dezynfekcja i czyszczenie; Fermentacja cicha; Stabilizacja; Testowanie i pomiary; Inny
pt-PT: Fase de vinificação: Envelhecimento e armazenamento a granel; Adoçamento após fermentação; Engarrafamento e embalamento; Carbonatação; Clarificação e colagem; Esmagamento e prensagem; Filtragem; Fermentação primária; Trasfega e transferência; Higienização e limpeza; Fermentação secundária; Estabilização; Teste e medição; Outro
sl-SI: Faza pridelave vina: Zorenje in shranjevanje; Dosladkanje; Stekleničenje in pakiranje; Karbonizacija; Čiščenje in bistrenje; Mletje in stiskanje; Filtriranje; Primarna fermentacija; Pretok in prečrpavanje; Razkuževanje in čiščenje; Sekundarna fermentacija; Stabilizacija; Testiranje in merjenje; Drugo
hr-HR: Faza proizvodnje vina: Odležavanje i skladištenje; Naknadno zaslađivanje; Punjenje u boce i pakiranje; Gaziranje; Bistrenje i pročišćavanje; Muljanje i prešanje; Filtriranje; Primarna fermentacija; Pretakanje i prijenos; Dezinfekcija i čišćenje; Sekundarna fermentacija; Stabilizacija; Ispitivanje i mjerenje; Ostalo
hu: Borkészítési szakasz: Érlelés és tartályos tárolás; Utóédesítés; Palackozás és csomagolás; Szénsavasítás; Derítés és tisztítás; Zúzás és préselés; Szűrés; Elsődleges erjedés; Fejtés és átfejtés; Fertőtlenítés és tisztítás; Másodlagos erjedés; Stabilizálás; Tesztelés és mérés; Egyéb
ko: 와인 제조 단계: 숙성 및 대량 저장; 백스위트닝; 병입 및 포장; 탄산화; 정제 및 청징; 파쇄 및 압착; 여과; 1차 발효; 래킹 및 이송; 살균 및 세척; 2차 발효; 안정화; 테스트 및 측정; 기타
cs: Fáze výroby vína: Zrání a skladování v sudu; Doslazování; Lahvování a balení; Karbonizace; Čiření a filtrace; Mletí a lisování; Filtrování; Primární fermentace; Stáčení a přečerpávání; Sanitace a čištění; Sekundární fermentace; Stabilizace; Testování a měření; Jiné
fr: Étape de vinification: Vieillissement et stockage en vrac; Édulcoration; Mise en bouteille et emballage; Gazéification; Clarification et collage; Foulage et pressurage; Filtration; Fermentation primaire; Soutirage et transfert; Désinfection et nettoyage; Fermentation secondaire; Stabilisation; Test et mesure; Autre
bg-BG: Етап на винопроизводството: Отлежаване и съхранение на едро; Допълнително подслаждане; Бутилиране и опаковане; Газиране; Избистряне и очистване; Смачкване и пресоване; Филтриране; Първична ферментация; Претакане и прехвърляне; Дезинфекция и почистване; Вторична ферментация; Стабилизиране; Тестване и измерване; Друго